Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-107
City council; powers; public utility plants, subways, landing fields; construction and maintenance; rates and charges.

The city council of a city of the metropolitan class may erect, construct, purchase, maintain, and operate subways or conduits, waterworks, gas works, electric light and power plants; provide and equip aerial landing fields; determine, fix, and charge rentals for subways and conduits; and fix rates to be charged by such enterprises, except as otherwise provided by law. The city council may adopt and promulgate and enforce all needful and proper rules and regulations in connection with the operation of any such enterprises.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. I, § 7, p. 408;

C.S.1922, § 3494;

C.S.1929, § 14-107;

R.S.1943, § 14-107;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 16.

Proper for city to grant permits for defendant's private use of streets. Dunmar Inv. Co. v. Northern Nat. Gas Co., 185 Neb. 400, 176 N.W.2d 4 (1970).

Mayor and council were authorized to grant a franchise for twenty-five years to furnish gas at a fixed rate. Omaha Gas Co. v. City of Omaha, 249 F. 350 (D. Neb. 1914).